Vermont, session 2025-2026, S76.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Health Equity Data Reporting * * *
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 253 is amended to read:
§ 253. DATA RESPONSIVE TO HEALTH EQUITY INQUIRIES
* * *
(b)(1) The Department of Health shall systematically analyze such health
equity data using the smallest appropriate units of analysis feasible to detect
VT LEG #380604 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.76
2025 Page 2 of 4
racial and ethnic disparities, as well as disparities along the lines of primary
language, sex, disability status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and
socioeconomic status, and report the results of such analysis on the
Department’s website periodically, but not less than biannually. The
Department’s analysis shall be used to measure over time the impact of actions
taken to reduce health disparities in Vermont. The data informing the
Department’s analysis shall be made available to the public in accordance with
State and federal law.
(2) Annually Every three years beginning in 2028, on or before January
15, the Department shall submit a report containing the results of the analysis
conducted pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection to the Senate
Committee on Health and Welfare and to the House Committees on Health
Care and on Human Services.
* * * Cancer Registry Disclosure Requirements * * *
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. § 155 is amended to read:
§ 155. DISCLOSURE
* * *
(b) The Commissioner may furnish confidential information to the National
Breast and Cervical Cancer Early Detection Program, other states’ cancer
registries, federal cancer control agencies, or health researchers in order to
collaborate in a national cancer registry or to collaborate in cancer control and
VT LEG #380604 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.76
2025 Page 3 of 4
prevention research studies. However, before releasing confidential
information, the Commissioner shall first obtain from such state registries,
agencies, or researchers an agreement in writing to keep assurances acceptable
to the Commissioner that the identifying information shall be kept confidential
and privileged as required by law. In the case of researchers, the
Commissioner shall also first obtain evidence of the approval of their academic
committee for the protection of human subjects established in accordance with
45 C.F.R. part 46 an institutional review board or privacy board in accordance
with 45 C.F.R. § 164.512(i)(1)(i)(A) and (B).
* * * Amyotrophic Lateral Sclerosis Registry Disclosure Requirements * * *
Sec. 3. 18 V.S.A. § 174 is amended to read:
§ 174. CONFIDENTIALITY
(a)(1) All identifying information regarding an individual patient or health
care provider is exempt from public inspection and copying under the Public
Records Act and shall be kept confidential.
(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection, the
Commissioner may enter into data sharing and protection agreements with
researchers or state, regional, or national amyotrophic lateral sclerosis
registries for bidirectional data exchange, provided access under such
agreements is consistent with the privacy, security, and disclosure protections
in this chapter. In the case of researchers, the Commissioner shall also first
VT LEG #380604 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.76
2025 Page 4 of 4
obtain evidence of the approval of their academic committee for the protection
of human subjects established in accordance with 45 C.F.R. Part 46 an
institutional review board or privacy board in accordance with 45 C.F.R.
§ 164.512(i)(1)(i)(A) and (B). The Commissioner shall disclose the minimum
information necessary to accomplish a specified research purpose.
* * *
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380604 v.1